Utah statutes.
20A-1-607.   Inducing attendance at polls -- Payment of workers.
(1) (a)  It is unlawful for any person to pay another for any loss due to
attendance at the polls or to registering.
(b)  This subsection does not permit an employer to make any deduction from
the usual salary or wages of any employee who takes a leave of absence as
authorized under Section 20A-3-103 for the purpose of voting.
(2) (a)  A person may not pay for personal services performed or to be
performed on the day of a caucus, primary, convention, or election, or for any
purpose connected with a caucus, primary, convention, or election that
directly or indirectly affect the result of the caucus, primary, convention,
or election.
(b)  Subsection (2) does not prohibit the hiring of persons whose sole duty it
is to act as challengers and watch the count of official ballots.
